Tennessee, session 114, HB2419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 51, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Before adopting an annexation ordinance, a municipality shall:
(1) Submit to the county legislative body in which the territory proposed
for annexation is located:
(A) A financial impact study, detailing the short-term and long-
term effects on county infrastructure, public services, including schools,
and county taxpayers; and
(B) A statement of financial viability, demonstrating the
municipality's capacity to provide services to the annexed area, including
water, sewer, roads, police, fire, and other obligations; and
(2) Obtain approval of such annexation by majority vote of the county
legislative body.
(b)
HB2419
012280
- 1 -

(1) The county legislative body has at least sixty (60) calendar days to
review the documentation and vote on the proposed annexation.
(2) A county legislative body's failure to act within sixty (60) days does
not constitute approval.
(3) If a county legislative body has not approved the annexation within
ninety (90) days of the submission pursuant to subsection (a), then the
annexation is deemed denied.
(c) This section does not apply to the annexation of a single, contiguous lot of
five (5) acres or less.
(d) The comptroller of the treasury shall prescribe the form and content of the
financial impact study and statement of financial viability required under subdivision
(a)(1).
(e) This section does not preempt any interlocal agreements or growth plans
established pursuant to chapter 58 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012280